Hawaii, session 2025, HB86.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the nearshore marine resources of the State are increasingly affected by both local and global stressors, indicating that current state management measures may be insufficient for ensuring long-term sustainability. The legislature further finds that the makai watch program was designed to enhance collaboration and minimize conflicts among nearshore resource users.  Since its inception in the early 2000s, the program has effectively connected community stewards with government agencies, fostering positive relationships and meaningful engagement.  The outcomes of the program include heightened awareness of relevant regulations and ecosystem conditions within designated areas, along with improved collaboration among makai watch, the department of land and natural resources' division of conservation and resources enforcement, division of aquatic resources, division of boating and ocean recreation, and the communities they serve. The legislature recognizes that makai watch continues to be a vital and expanding resource for co-managing nearshore areas, ensuring these ecosystems remain healthy and plentiful for both current and future generations of Hawaii.  Additionally, community enthusiasm for enhanced co-managed stewardship is strong across many of Hawaii's coastal communities, particularly among Native Hawaiian groups and organizations.  Therefore, the legislature finds that expanding support for the makai watch program is a priority for the State.  Given the increasing human population, expanded land use, and other rising threats to marine resources, it is more crucial than ever to develop and implement effective makai watch site programs and establish a permanent statewide coordinator position. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to provide the department of land and natural resources with the necessary funds to establish full-time equivalent (     FTE) permanent program specialist V positions within the department to successfully coordinate and implement actions necessary to meet the goals and objectives of the makai watch program. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of      full-time equivalent ( FTE) permanent program specialist V positions within the department of land and natural resources to support the ongoing coordination and implementation of the makai watch program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.